California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Of the stabilization funding remaining, after allocations pursuant to subdivision (a), that are payable to project year private DSH hospitals, 66.4 percent shall be allocated and distributed among those hospitals pro rata based on the amounts determined in accordance with Section 14166.11, and 33.6 percent shall be transferred to the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the stabilization funding payable to project year private DSH hospitals under Section 14166.20 for a project year as determined under this section that has not been paid, or specifically committed for payment, to hospitals prior to January 1, 2012, may be utilized by the director to make payments to hospitals that received underpayments pursuant to Section 14166.11 due to improper peer group classifications for the 2005–06 and 2006–07 payment adjustment years.

(2) The balance after payments made pursuant to paragraph (1), if any, of the stabilization funding payable to project year private DSH hospitals under Section 14166.20 shall not be paid to the project year private DSH hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.20. The funds that would otherwise be paid from the Private Hospital Supplemental Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund, and funds that would otherwise be drawn from the General Fund for payments to the private DSH hospitals pursuant to Section 14166.20 shall be retained in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 91.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.15.

(a) Payments to nondesignated public hospitals under the demonstration project shall include, as applicable, the following:

(1) Payments under selective provider contracts with the department negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission in accordance with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) Disproportionate share hospital payments under
 Section 14166.16.

(3) Supplemental payments under Section 14166.17.

(4) Payments to distressed hospitals as negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission pursuant to Section 14166.23.

(5) Payment of amounts described in Section 14166.19.

(b) Payments under subdivision (a) shall be in addition to other payments that may be made in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 560, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 2005.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.151.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow for a voluntary process for nondesignated public hospitals to claim reimbursement from the safety net care pool in the successor demonstration project based on their public structure, to the extent that there is funding available for nondesignated public hospitals in that pool, as allowed by the federal government, which shall be allocated equally between the state and the nondesignated public hospital, so that for every dollar of certified public expenditure used by the nondesignated public hospital, the nondesignated public hospital shall voluntarily allow the state to use a corresponding certified public expenditure amount for claiming purposes.

(b) (1) Beginning with services provided on or after July 1, 2013, nondesignated public hospitals shall be eligible to receive safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care costs to the extent that additional federal funding is made available pursuant to the Special Terms and Conditions for the safety net care pool uncompensated care limit of the successor demonstration project and if they comply with the requirements set forth in this section.

(2) The amount of funds that may be claimed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed the additional federal funding made available under the safety net care pool for nondesignated public hospital uncompensated care costs, and shall not reduce the amounts of federal funding for safety net care pool uncompensated care costs that would otherwise be made available to designated public hospitals in the absence of this paragraph, including the amounts available under the Special Terms and
 Conditions in effect as of July 1, 2013, and amounts available pursuant to Section 15916.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if the designated public hospitals do not have sufficient certified public expenditures to claim the full amount of federal funding made available to the designated public hospitals as referenced in paragraph (2), including consideration of the potential for the designated public hospitals to have sufficient certified public expenditures in a subsequent year, the department may authorize the funding to be claimed by the nondesignated public hospitals.

(B) The department may determine whether designated public hospitals do not have sufficient certified public expenditures to claim the full amount of federal funding pursuant to subparagraph (B) no sooner than after the submission of the cost reporting information required pursuant to
 Section 14166.8 for the applicable successor demonstration year.

(C) If the department makes the determination identified in subparagraph (B) based on as-filed cost reporting information submitted prior to a final audit, the department shall make the determination in consultation with the designated public hospitals and shall apply an audit cushion of at least 5 percent to the as-filed cost information. If the department makes the determination identified in subparagraph (B) based on audited cost reporting information, no audit cushion shall be applied.

(c) Beginning in the 2013–14 fiscal year, within five months after the end of a successor demonstration year, nondesignated public hospitals shall submit to the department all of the following reports:

(1) The hospital’s Medicare or Medicaid cost report for the
 successor demonstration year.

(2) Other cost reporting and statistical data necessary for the determination of amounts due to the hospital under the successor demonstration project, as requested by the department.

(d) For each successor demonstration year, the reports shall identify all of the costs incurred in providing hospital services to uninsured individuals.

(e) A nondesignated public hospital, or the governmental entity with which it is affiliated, that operates nonhospital clinics or provides physician, nonphysician practitioner, or other health care services that are not identified as hospital services under the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project, shall report and certify all of the uncompensated uninsured costs of the services furnished.

(f) Reports submitted under this section shall include all allowable costs.

(g) The appropriate public official shall certify to all of the following:

(1) The accuracy of the reports required under this section.

(2) That the expenditures to meet the reported costs comply with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) That the sources of funds used to make the expenditures certified under this section do not include impermissible provider taxes or donations, as defined under Section 1396b(w) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or other federal funds. For this purpose, federal funds do not include delivery system reform incentive pool payments or patient care revenue
 received as payment for services rendered under programs such as nondesignated state health programs, the Low Income Health Program, Medicare, or Medicaid.

(h) The certification of public expenditures made pursuant to this section shall be based on a schedule established by the department in accordance with federal requirements.

(1) The director may require nondesignated public hospitals to submit quarterly estimates of anticipated expenditures, if these estimates are necessary to obtain interim payments of federal Medicaid funds.

(2) All reported expenditures shall be subject to reconciliation to allowable costs, as determined in accordance with applicable implementing documents for the successor demonstration project.

(i) The timeframes for data
 submission and reporting periods may be adjusted as necessary in accordance with federal requirements.

(j) (1) Beginning in the 2013–14 fiscal year, safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care shall be allocated to nondesignated public hospitals as follows:

(A) The department shall determine the maximum amount of safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care that is available to nondesignated public hospitals for the successor demonstration year pursuant to this section. This determination shall be made solely with respect to allowable uncompensated care costs incurred by nondesignated public hospitals and reported pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive.

(B) The department shall establish, in consultation with the nondesignated public hospitals, an allocation methodology
 to determine the amount of safety net care pool payments to be made to the nondesignated public hospitals. The allocation methodology shall be implemented when the director issues a declaration stating that the methodology complies with all applicable federal requirements for federal financial participation.

(2) A safety net care pool payment amount may be paid to a nondesignated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, pursuant to this section independent of the amount of uncompensated uninsured costs that is certified as public expenditures pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, provided that, in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project, the recipient hospital shall not return any portion of the funds received to any unit of government, excluding amounts recovered by the state or federal government.

(3) Nondesignated public hospitals, or governmental entities with which they are affiliated, shall receive the amount established pursuant to this subdivision, less the 50 percent retained by the state pursuant to subdivision (l), in quarterly interim payments during the successor demonstration year. The determination of the interim payments shall be made on an interim basis prior to the start of each successor demonstration year. The department shall use the cost and statistical data that is in subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive.

(k) (1) No later than April 1 following the end of the relevant reporting period for the successor demonstration year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of the payment amount established pursuant to subdivision (j) for nondesignated public hospitals using Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data submitted by the hospitals for the successor
 demonstration year, and shall adjust payments to the hospitals accordingly.

(2) All payments to nondesignated public hospitals are subject to a final reconciliation that is subject to final audits of all applicable Medicare and other cost, payment, discharge, and statistical data for the successor demonstration year.

(l) The process for supplemental payments made in subdivisions (j) and (k) is a voluntary process the implementation of which is limited by this subdivision. The department may submit for federal approval a proposed amendment to the successor demonstration project to implement this section.

(1) If a nondesignated public hospital voluntarily agrees to participate in a process that, up to the amount of safety net care pool funds available, allows the certified public expenditures for uncompensated care
 under this section to be allocated equally between the state and the nondesignated public hospital, so that for every dollar of certified public expenditure used by the nondesignated public hospital, the nondesignated public hospital shall voluntarily allow the state to use a corresponding certified public expenditure amount for claiming purposes. Participation in the safety net care pool under this section is voluntary on the part of the nondesignated public hospital for the purposes of all applicable federal laws. If a nondesignated public hospital does not voluntarily agree to participate in this process, it shall not be eligible to receive safety net care pool funds.

(2) If the budget neutrality requirements established under Section XI of the Special Terms and Conditions of the successor demonstration project are exceeded, payments made under this section shall be reduced or refunded to achieve budget neutrality before any other payments
 under the successor demonstration project are made. The state’s share of the federal financial participation shall be reduced after the provider’s share has been exhausted.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the receipt of a notice of disallowance or deferral from the federal government related to any certified public expenditures for uncompensated care incurred by the nondesignated public hospital that are used for federal claiming under the safety net care pool pursuant to the successor demonstration project after this section is implemented, and subject to the processes set forth in this section, the department and the nondesignated public hospitals shall each be responsible for one-half of the repayment of the federal portion of any federal disallowance or deferral for the applicable successor demonstration year, up to the amount claimed and allocated pursuant to this section for that particular year beginning with the
 2013–14 fiscal year.

(4) This section shall be implemented only to the extent other federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(m) Eligible providers, as a condition of receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section, shall enter into, and maintain, an agreement with the department for the purposes of implementing this section and reimbursing the department for the costs of administering this section, including, but not limited to, the state personnel costs. No General Fund moneys shall be expended for the implementation and administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 672, Sec. 2.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section initially operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to this amendment's removal of the condition formerly in subd. (f).   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.16.

(a) The department shall pay to each nondesignated public hospital that is an eligible hospital for the project year, as determined under Section 14105.98, disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments as more specifically set forth in this section.

(b) For each project year, the department shall develop and issue a tentative and final disproportionate share list in accordance with Section 14105.98.

(c) (1) The department shall compute, for each nondesignated public hospital that is an eligible disproportionate share hospital for the project year, the payment adjustment amounts as determined under paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and (6) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, and the supplemental payment adjustment amounts as determined under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98.

(2) The department shall perform the computations set forth in Section 14163 to determine the hospital’s transfer amount as though that section were still in effect.

(3) The disproportionate share hospital payment amount for each nondesignated public hospital for each project year shall be the sum of the amounts computed under paragraph (1) less the amount
 determined for the hospital under paragraph (2).

(4) For purposes of the computations under this subdivision, the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for each project year shall be the allotment effective during the federal fiscal year beginning during the project year.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the transfer amounts from the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund, as provided for pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14163, shall be deemed to be eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) for purposes of the computations under this subdivision.

(6) Subdivision (m) of Section 14105.98 shall apply to payments made under this section.

(7) The federal
 share of the payment amounts determined under this subdivision and paid pursuant to this section, excluding the stabilization funding amounts allocated and paid pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), shall be drawn from the allotment of federal funds for Medicaid disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments for California specified under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) To the extent necessary to compute and determine compliance with the hospital-specific disproportionate share hospital payment limitations described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14166.3, nondesignated public hospitals shall comply with subdivisions (a), (b), and (d) of Section 14166.8.

(e) Two interim payments shall be made for the first portion of the project year, on October 1 and December 1 of each project year, as follows:

(1) The interim payments shall be made to each nondesignated public hospital identified on a tentative disproportionate share list for the project year that was also on the final disproportionate share list for the prior fiscal year. The interim payment amount for each hospital shall be paid in two equal amounts on October 1 and December 1 of each project year, which combined shall equal five-twelfths of the total payments, excluding stabilization funds, made to the hospital for the prior fiscal year under this section, except that for the 2005–06 project year, the combined amount shall equal the amount that was payable to the hospital for the 2004–05 fiscal year under Section 14105.98, less the transfer amount assessed with respect to the hospital under Section 14163 for the same fiscal year, multiplied by five-twelfths. The interim payment amount may be adjusted to reflect any changes in the total payment amounts, excluding stabilization funds,
 projected to be made under this section for the project year.

(2) The computation of interim payments described in this subdivision shall be made promptly after the department issues the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for the project year.

(3) The first interim payment to each hospital for a project year shall be made no later than 60 days after the issuance of the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for the project year and shall include the interim payment amounts for all prior months in the project year. Subsequent interim payments for a project year shall be made on the last checkwrite of each month made by the Controller until interim payments for the first five months of the project year have been made.

(4) The department may recover any interim payments made under this subdivision
 for a project year to a hospital that is not on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year. These interim payments shall be considered an overpayment. The department shall issue a demand for repayment to a hospital at least 30 days prior to taking action to recover the overpayment. After the 30-day period, the department may recover the overpayment using any of the methods set forth in Section 14115.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 14172.5. Any offset shall be subject to Section 14115.5 or subdivision (d) of Section 14172.5. No other provision of Section 14172.5 shall be applicable with respect to the recovery of overpayments under this subdivision. A hospital may appeal the department’s determination of an overpayment under this subdivision pursuant to the appeal procedures set forth in Sections 51016 to 51047, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and seek judicial review of the final administrative decision pursuant to Section 14171, provided that the only
 issues that may be raised in the appeal are whether the hospital, but for inadvertent error by the department, was on the final disproportionate share list for the project year and whether the department’s computation of the overpayment amount is correct. If the hospital is reinstated on the final disproportionate share list pursuant to Section 14105.98, the department shall promptly refund any amount recovered under this paragraph.

(f) Tentative adjusted monthly payments shall be made for December through March of each project year to each nondesignated public hospital identified on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, computed and paid as follows:

(1) An adjusted payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus
 the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, less the amount computed pursuant to Section 14163, each as most recently computed by the department as described in subdivision (c).

(2) A tentative adjusted monthly payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the adjusted payment amount for the hospital, minus the aggregate interim payments made to the hospital for the project year, divided by seven.

(3) The computation of tentative adjusted monthly payments described in this subdivision shall be made promptly after the department issues the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year.

(4) The first tentative adjusted monthly payment to each hospital for a project year shall be made by January 15 or within 60 days after
 the issuance of the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, whichever is later, and shall include the tentative adjusted monthly payment amounts for all prior months in the project year for which those payments are due. Subsequent tentative adjusted monthly payments for a project year shall be made on the last checkwrite of each month made by the Controller until tentative adjusted monthly payments for December through March of the project year have been made.

(g) Three data corrected payments shall be made on the last checkwrite of the month made by the Controller for the months of April through June of each project year to each nondesignated public hospital identified on the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, computed and paid as follows:

(1) An annual data corrected payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal
 to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, less the amount computed pursuant to Section 14163, each as most recently computed by the department as described in subdivision (c). The annual data corrected payment amounts shall reflect data corrections, hospital closures, and other revisions made by the department to the adjusted payment amounts computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(2) A monthly data corrected payment amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the annual data corrected payment amount for the hospital, minus both the aggregate interim payments made to the hospital for the project year and the aggregate tentative adjusted monthly payments made to the hospital, divided by three.

(h) Payment under subdivisions (e), (f), and (g) for a month shall be made only to hospitals open for patient care through the 15th day of the month.

(i) The department shall compute a final adjusted payment amount for each nondesignated public hospital on the final disproportionate share list for a project year after the completion of the project year and the determination of the amount of stabilization funding available to be paid under this section as follows:

(1) An amount shall be computed for each hospital equal to the sum of the total payment adjustment amount for the hospital computed pursuant to subdivision (am) of Section 14105.98, plus the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount computed pursuant to subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, less the amount computed pursuant to Section 14163, each as most
 recently computed by the department as described in subdivision (c). These amounts shall reflect data corrections, hospital closures, and other revisions made by the department to the annual data corrected payment amounts computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) in a manner that ensures that any payments not payable or recouped are redistributed among hospitals eligible for a final adjusted payment amount in accordance with the calculations made pursuant to Section 14105.98.

(2) The department shall add to the amount computed for each hospital under paragraph (1) a pro rata share of any stabilization funding to be allocated and paid under this section allocated based on the amounts computed under paragraph (1). The federal share of any stabilization funding allocated and paid under this section shall not be drawn from the allotment of federal funding for Medicaid disproportionate share hospital payment adjustments for California
 specified under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) The department shall for each hospital for each project year reconcile the total amount computed for the hospital for the project year under subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) with the amount determined under paragraph (2). The department shall issue a report to each hospital setting forth the result of the reconciliation that shall include the department’s computation, data, and identification of data sources. The department shall pay to the hospital any underpayment determined as a result of this reconciliation and collect from the hospital any overpayment determined as a result of this reconciliation.

(4) A hospital may seek to correct the department’s data and computations under this section in accordance with the processes undertaken by the department to implement Section 14105.98 in effect during the
 2004–05 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 327, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.17.

(a) The California Medical Assistance Commission shall negotiate payment amounts in accordance with the selective provider contracting program established pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) from the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) for distribution to nondesignated public hospitals that satisfy the criteria of subdivision (o). Pursuant to Section 14165, on and after July 1, 2012, the Director of Health Care Services shall exercise the discretion granted to the California Medical Assistance Commission.

(b) (1) The Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental
 Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. For purposes of this section, “fund” means the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund.

(2) Effective December 31, 2028, the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund in the State Treasury, created pursuant to this section, is hereby abolished. All moneys remaining in the fund or moneys designated to be deposited to the fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes specified in this section.

(d) Except as otherwise limited by this section, the fund shall consist of all of the following:

(1) One million nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000), which shall be transferred annually from General Fund amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the fund.

(2) Any additional moneys appropriated to the fund.

(3) All stabilization funding transferred to the fund.

(4) All private moneys donated by private individuals or entities to the department for deposit in the fund as permitted under applicable federal Medicaid laws.

(5) Any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund.

(e) The department may accept or not accept moneys offered to the department for deposit in the fund. If the department accepts moneys
 pursuant to this section, the department shall obtain federal financial participation to the full extent permitted by law. With respect to funds transferred or donated from private individuals or entities, the department shall accept only those funds that are certified by the transferring or donating entity as qualifying for federal financial participation under the terms of the Medicaid Voluntary Contribution and Provider-Specific Tax Amendments of 1991 (Public Law 102-234) or Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as applicable. The department may return any funds transferred or donated in error.

(f) Moneys in the funds shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of payments to hospitals under this section.

(g) Any funds remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward for use in the following fiscal year.

(h) Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the department and shall be applied to obtain federal financial participation in accordance with customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures for purposes of payments under this section. Distributions from the fund shall be supplemental to any other Medi-Cal reimbursement received by the hospitals, including amounts that hospitals receive under the selective provider contracts negotiated under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), and shall not affect provider rates paid under the selective provider contracting program.

(i) Each nondesignated public hospital that was a nondesignated public hospital during the 2002–03 fiscal year, received payments for the 2002–03 fiscal year from any of the prior supplemental funds, and, during the project year satisfies the criteria in subdivision (o) to be eligible to negotiate for distributions
 under any of those sections shall receive no less from the Nondesignated Public Hospital Supplemental Fund for the project year than 100 percent of the amount the hospital received from the prior supplemental funds for the 2002–03 fiscal year, minus the total amount of intergovernmental transfers made by or on behalf of the hospital pursuant to subdivision (o) for the same fiscal year. Each hospital described in this subdivision shall be eligible for additional payments from the fund pursuant to subdivision (j).

(j) (1) For each fiscal year up to and including the 2024–25 fiscal year, all amounts that are in the fund for a project year in excess of the amount necessary to make the payments under subdivision (i) shall be available
 for negotiation by the California Medical Assistance Commission, along with corresponding federal financial participation, for supplemental payments to nondesignated public hospitals that for the project year satisfy the criteria under subdivision (o) to be eligible to negotiate for distributions under any of those sections, and paid for services rendered during the project year pursuant to the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, all amounts that are in the fund for a project year in excess of the amount necessary to make the payments under subdivision (i) shall be available for supplemental payments to nondesignated public hospitals, as follows:

(A) Additional supplemental payments shall be made to nondesignated public hospitals that meet the criteria for supplemental payments pursuant to paragraph (1) such that the payments under this subparagraph together with the payments under subdivision (i) to those hospitals are equal to the amounts transferred to the fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) plus the applicable amount of federal financial participation that is available for the nonfederal share of payments described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(B) All remaining amounts in the fund, including any funds that have been carried forward pursuant to subdivision (g), shall be used for supplemental payments to nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to a methodology developed by the department that is
 based on all Medi-Cal inpatient days, as described in Section 1396r-4(b)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, in the numerator of the Medi-Cal inpatient utilization rate for each hospital, as determined in the most recent final calculation of the Medi-Cal inpatient utilization rate pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 14105.98 as of July 1, 2025.

(k) The amount of any stabilization funding transferred to the fund with respect to a project year may in the discretion of the California Medical Assistance Commission, until its dissolution on June 30, 2012, to be paid for services furnished in the same project year regardless of when the stabilization funds become available, provided the payment is consistent with other applicable federal or state legal requirements and does not result in a hospital exceeding any applicable reimbursement limitations. On and after July 1, 2012, the Director of Health
 Care Services shall exercise the discretion granted to the California Medical Assistance Commission by this subdivision.

(l) The department shall pay amounts due to a nondesignated hospital from the fund for a project year, with the exception of stabilization funding, in up to four installment payments, unless otherwise provided in the hospital’s contract negotiated with the California Medical Assistance Commission, except that hospitals that are not described in subdivision (i) shall not receive the first installment payment. The first payment shall be made as soon as practicable after the issuance of the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for the project year, and in no event later than January 1 of the project year. The second and subsequent payments shall be made after the issuance of the final disproportionate hospital list for the project year, and shall be made only to hospitals that are on the final disproportionate share
 hospital list for the project year. The second payment shall be made by February 1 of the project year or as soon as practicable after the issuance of the final disproportionate share hospital list for the project year. The third payment, if scheduled, shall be made by April 1 of the project year. The fourth payment, if scheduled, shall be made by June 30 of the project year. This subdivision does not apply to hospitals that are scheduled to receive payments from the fund because they meet the criteria under paragraph (2) of subdivision (o) but do not meet the criteria under paragraph (1), (3), or (4) of subdivision (o).

(m) The department shall pay stabilization funding transferred to the fund in amounts negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission and paid in accordance with the applicable contract or contract amendment.

(n) A nondesignated public hospital that
 receives payment pursuant to this section for a particular project year shall not submit a notice for the termination of its participation in the selective provider contracting program established pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) until the later of the following dates:

(1) On or after December 31 of the next project year.

(2) The date specified in the hospital’s contract, if applicable.

(o) In order for a hospital to receive distributions pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), the hospital shall satisfy the eligibility criteria in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subdivision.

(1) The hospital meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The
 hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(B) The hospital meets the criteria contained in the Medicaid State Plan for disproportionate share hospital status.

(C) The hospital is one of the following:

(i) A licensed provider of basic emergency services as described in Section 70411 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) A licensed provider of comprehensive emergency medical services as defined in Section 70451 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(iii) A children’s hospital, as defined in Section 14087.21, that satisfies clause (i) or (ii), or that jointly provides basic or comprehensive emergency services in conjunction with
 another licensed hospital.

(iv) A hospital owned and operated by a public agency that operates two or more hospitals that qualify under subparagraph (A) or (B) with respect to the particular state fiscal year.

(v) A hospital designated by the National Cancer Institute as a comprehensive or clinical cancer research center that primarily treats acutely ill cancer patients and that is exempt from the federal Medicare prospective payment system pursuant to Section 1886(d)(1)(B)(v) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v)).

(D) (1) The hospital is able to demonstrate a purpose for additional funding under the selective provider contracting program including proposals relating to emergency services and other health care services, including infrequent yet high-cost
 services, such as anti-AB human antitoxin treatment for infant botulism (human botulinum immune globulin (HBIG), commonly referred to as “Baby-BIG”), that are made available, or will be made available, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(2) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) and meets the definition of a university teaching hospital or major, nonuniversity, teaching hospital as set forth on page 51 and as listed on page 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping.” Payments from the fund shall be used solely for the purposes identified in the contract between the hospital and the state.

(3) The hospital is contracting under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081) and meets the definition of any of the following:

(A) A large teaching emphasis
 hospital, as set forth on page 51 and listed on page 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping,” and also meets the definition of eligible hospital as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) A children’s hospital pursuant to Section 10727, and also meets the definition of eligible hospital as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(C) Notwithstanding the requirement in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) that a hospital must be listed on page 57 of the department’s report dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping,” any hospital whose license pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code was consolidated during the 1999 calendar year with a large teaching emphasis hospital that is listed on page 57 of the above-described report shall be
 eligible. All other requirements of paragraph (3) shall continue to apply.
